test/src/morphology/N-красота_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - красота M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      красота+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: красота́
      красота+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: красоту́
      красота+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: красоты́
      красота+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: красоте́
      красота+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: красоте́
      красота+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: красото́й
      красота+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: красо́ты
      красота+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: красо́ты
      красота+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: красо́т
      красота+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: красо́тах
      красота+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: красо́там
      красота+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: красо́тами
